Maine, session 132, LD1634.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Maine as follows:
Sec. 1. 22 MRSA §3197 is enacted to read:
§3197. Limitation on waiting time for services
Waiting time for any service available under the MaineCare program is governed by
this section.
1. Six-month limitation on waiting time. The department shall require that for any
service covered under the MaineCare program, the maximum amount of time a covered
individual may be placed on a waiting list or otherwise wait for service is 6 months from
the time the covered individual requests the service in the manner required under the
MaineCare program or by the provider of the service.
2. Corrective action plan; report to Legislature. If at any time a waiting list
maintained by a provider requires covered individuals to wait longer than 6 months for a
service covered under the MaineCare program, the department shall, within 3 months of
notice of this occurrence, issue a report to the joint standing committee of the Legislature
having jurisdiction over health and human services matters containing a corrective action
plan to reduce waiting times in compliance with subsection 1.
For the purposes of this section, "covered individual" means an individual who is
eligible for and enrolled in the MaineCare program.